Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-24] Sexual assault evidence;
reporting. (a) By September 1, 2016, all law enforcement agencies and
departments charged with the maintenance, storage, and preservation of sexual
assault evidence collection kits shall conduct an inventory of all such kits
being stored by the agency or department.

(b) By September 1, 2016, each law enforcement
agency and department subject to subsection (a) shall compile, in writing, a
report containing the number of untested sexual assault evidence collection kits
in the possession of the agency or department and the date the sexual assault
evidence collection kit was collected. The reports shall be transmitted to the
department of the attorney general.

(c) By December 1, 2016, the department of the
attorney general shall prepare and transmit a report to the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives containing the number of
untested sexual assault evidence collection kits currently being stored by each
county, law enforcement agency, or department and the date each untested kit
was originally collected. The department of the attorney general shall involve
community stakeholders in drafting the report, including representatives from
each county. The report shall also provide the following information:

(1) An explanation of the processes that were used in
the past to decide which sexual assault evidence collection kits were and were
not tested;

(2) Progress made to reduce the number of untested
sexual assault evidence collection kits to date;

(3) A plan and expected time frame for further
reduction in the number of untested sexual assault evidence collection kits;

(4) A plan for determining priority of untested
sexual assault evidence collection kits and new sexual assault evidence
collection kits for testing;

(5) Processes that have been adopted or will be
adopted to better track and inventory tested and untested sexual assault
evidence collection kits, including their locations;

(6) Expected outcomes from testing untested sexual
assault evidence collection kits and testing new sexual assault evidence
collection kits;

(7) The criteria and process to determine which
untested sexual assault evidence collection kits will be tested and the
criteria and process for testing to be applied to all new sexual assault
evidence collection kits;

(8) The sites and locations of the testing of the
untested sexual assault evidence collection kits and testing of new sexual
assault evidence collection kits;

(9) Victim notification, support services, and other
resources that may become necessary in connection with testing untested sexual
assault evidence collection kits and new sexual assault evidence collection
kits;

(10) The expected cost of all projected plans and
processes not yet in place for testing untested sexual assault evidence
collection kits and new sexual assault evidence collection kits;

(11) An assessment of potential funding sources,
including federal grants for which applications have been, will be, or may be
submitted; and

(12) Potential areas for further legislative action or
policy changes.

(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, all law
enforcement agencies and departments shall submit new sexual assault evidence
collection kits for testing in accordance with the criteria and policies established
and reported by the department of the attorney general pursuant to subsection
(c).

(e) By July 1, 2018, all law enforcement
agencies and departments shall complete the testing of all untested sexual
assault evidence collection kits in accordance with criteria and policies
established and reported by the department of the attorney general pursuant to
subsection (c).

(f) As used in this section:

"Forensic medical examination" means
an examination provided to the victim of a suspected sexually-oriented criminal
offense by a health care provider for the purpose of gathering and preserving
evidence of a suspected sexual assault.

"Sexual assault evidence collection
kit" means a human biological specimen or specimens collected by a health
care provider during a forensic medical examination from the victim of a
suspected sexually-oriented criminal offense.

"Untested sexual assault evidence
collection kit" means a sexual assault evidence collection kit that has
not been submitted to a qualified laboratory for either a serology or DNA test.
[L 2016, c 207, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next